Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7711
Consumer reporting agency; prohibited acts.

(1) No consumer reporting agency shall provide or sell data or lists that include any information that in whole or in part was submitted in conjunction with an insurance inquiry about a consumer's credit information or a request for a credit report or insurance score. Such information includes, but is not limited to, the expiration dates of an insurance policy or any other information that may identify time periods during which a consumer's insurance may expire and the terms and conditions of the consumer's insurance coverage.

(2) The restrictions provided in subsection (1) of this section do not apply to data or lists the consumer reporting agency supplies to the insurance producer from whom information was received, the insurer on whose behalf such insurance producer acted, or such insurer's affiliates or holding companies.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict any insurer from being able to obtain a claims history report or a motor vehicle report.

Laws 2003, LB 487, § 11.